da: Skinneside: Venstre; Par; Højre; Universal; Andet
en: Rail side: Left; Pair; Right; Universal; Other
nb: Skinnesiden: Venstre; Par; Høyre; Universell; Annet
bg-BG: Страна на релсата: Ляво; Чифт; Дясно; Универсално; Други
ja: レール側: 左; ペア; 右; ユニバーサル; その他
hr-HR: Strana željeznice: Lijeva; Par; Desna; Univerzalna; Ostalo
zh-CN: 导轨侧边: 左侧; 一对; 右侧; 通用; 其他
cs: Strana kolejnice: Levá; Pár; Pravá; Univerzální; Ostatní
it: lato ringhiera: Sinistra; Coppia; Destra; Universale; Altro
vi: Phía đường ray: Trái; Cặp; Phải; Đa năng; Khác
de: Schienenseite: Links; Paar; Rechts; Universal; Sonstige
tr: Ray tarafı: Sol; Çift; Sağ; Evrensel; Diğer
ru: Сторона планки: Левая; Пара; Правая; Универсальная; Другое
pl: Strona kolejowa: Lewa; Para; Prawa; Uniwersalna; Inne
hu: Sínoldal: Bal; Pár; Jobb; Univerzális; Egyéb
el: Πλευρά των ραγών: Αριστερά; Ζεύγος; Δεξιά; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
fr: Côté du rail: Gauche; Paire; Droite; Universel; Autre
fi: Kiskon puoli: Vasen; Pari; Oikea; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
ko: 레일 측면: 왼쪽; 쌍; 오른쪽; 범용; 기타
sk-SK: Strana držiaka: Ľavá; Pár; Pravá; Univerzálna; Iné
th: ริมรางรถไฟ: ซ้าย; คู่; ขวา; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Trilho lado: Esquerda; Par; Direita; Universal; Outros
pt-PT: Lado do trilho: Esquerda; Par; Direita; Universal; Outro
nl: Rail zijde: Links; Paar; Rechts; Universeel; Overig
lt-LT: Bėgelio pusė: Kairė; Pora; Dešinė; Universalus; Kita
sv: Skenans sida: Vänster; Par; Höger; Universell; Övrigt
ro-RO: Partea șinei: Stânga; Pereche; Dreapta; Universal; Altele
zh-TW: 導軌側邊: 左側; 一對; 右側; 通用; 其他
sl-SI: Stran tirnice: Leva; Par; Desna; Univerzalna; Drugo
es: Lado del ferrocarril: Izquierda; Par; Derecha; Universal; Otro